District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.05

Public buildings and grounds belonging to the United States.

The provisions of the several laws and regulations within the District of Columbia for the protection of public or private property and the preservation of peace and order are extended to all public buildings and public grounds belonging to the United States within the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320, § 15

History

Capitol Building and Grounds, jurisdiction and control, see § 10-503.01.
Public parks, playgrounds, and reservations, regulation and control, see § 10-101 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 4-116.
1973 Ed., § 4-120.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 802 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).

Emergency Legislation